California statutes. Vehicle Code
Except as provided under subdivision (c) of Section 34630 and subdivision (d) of Section 34640, a motor carrier permit suspended or revoked under the provisions of this code shall not be reinstated until a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) has been paid, and the motor carrier permitholder has met all requirements for the issuance of a permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

34672.

If a motor carrier permit is paid for by a check that is dishonored by the bank, the permit shall be canceled. The department shall notify the carrier that the check was dishonored and that the permit will be canceled 30 days from the date of notification if the applicant does not make restitution. If the applicant does not make restitution for the dishonored check, and pay the dishonored check fee within 30 days of the notice, the application for a motor carrier permit shall be canceled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 825, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.86. PRIVATE CARRIERS OF PASSENGERS REGISTRATION ACT [34680. - 34693.]

34680.

This division may be cited as the Private Carriers of Passengers Registration Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34681.

(a) For purposes of this division, “private carrier” means a not-for-hire motor carrier, as defined in Section 408, who transports passengers and is required to obtain a carrier identification number pursuant to Section 34507.5, including an organization that provides transportation services incidental to the operation of a youth camp that is either a nonprofit organization that qualifies for tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or an organization that operates an organized camp, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, serving youth 18 years of age or younger.

(b) For purposes of this division, “private carrier” does not include
 either of the following:

(1) The operator of an automobile rental business that uses vehicles owned or leased by that operator, without charge other than as may be included in the automobile rental charges, to carry its customers to or from its office or facility where rental vehicles are furnished or returned after the rental period.

(2) The operator of a hotel, motel, or other place of temporary lodging that provides transportation service in vehicles owned or leased by that operator, without charge other than as may be included in the charges for lodging, between the lodging facility and an air, rail, water, or bus passenger terminal or between the lodging facility and any place of entertainment or commercial attraction, including, but not limited to, facilities providing snow skiing.
 Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the operator of a hotel, motel, or other place of temporary lodging to provide any
 round-trip sightseeing service without a permit, as required by subdivision (c) of Section 5384 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34682.

The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall furnish, upon request, whatever information from its records may be required to assist the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol in the effective enforcement of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34683.

(a) Except as provided in Section 34686, a private carrier of passengers shall not operate a motor vehicle on any public highway in this state unless its operation is currently registered with the department. The department shall grant registration upon the filing of the application and the payment of the fee as required by this division, subject to the private carrier of passengers’ compliance with this division. A private carrier of passengers who is exempt from registration need not file a notice of exemption.

(b) To satisfy the registration requirement described in subdivision (a), a private carrier of passengers shall submit required fees and all of the
 following information and documents to the department:

(1) The carrier identification number issued to the applicant by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(2) Identification information, including business name, form of business, addresses, including mailing address, contact person’s name, and phone number.

(3) Whether the registrant provides transportation services incidental to operation of an organized camp, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, or as a nonprofit that qualifies for a tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or neither.

(4) Proof of insurance or financial responsibility as
 required under Section 34687.

(5) The dated signature of the person completing the form that
 declares under penalty of perjury that the information provided is true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34684.

A fee of thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be paid to the department for the filing of the initial registration of private carriers of passengers, and an annual renewal fee of thirty dollars ($30) shall also be paid by private carriers of passengers. The fees required to be paid by private carriers of passengers pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34685.

(a) When the Department of the California Highway Patrol issues a carrier identification number pursuant to Section 34507.5 to a private carrier of passengers, it shall inform the carrier of the provisions of this division and the requirement that the carrier register with the department.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall periodically, but not less frequently than quarterly, transmit to the department a list of the persons, firms, and corporations identified as private carriers of passengers to which it has issued a carrier identification number. Upon receipt of the list, the department shall notify the private carriers of passengers of the
 registration requirements and of the penalties for failure to register.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34686.

The State of California and its agencies and political subdivisions are exempt from the registration requirements of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34687.

(a) Registration shall not be granted to a private carrier of passengers until proof of financial responsibility is filed by an insurer or surety with the department. The department may accept only a currently effective certificate of insurance issued by a company licensed to write that insurance in this state or by a nonadmitted insurer subject to Section 1763 of the Insurance Code, and only if the policy represented by the certificate meets the minimum insurance requirements contained in Section 34692, or a surety bond evidencing protection against liability imposed by law for the payment of damages for personal injury to, or death of, a person or property damage, or both. Each certificate shall be valid until canceled, and may only be canceled upon 30 days’ written notice submitted to the department by the carrier or
 surety.

(b) Whenever the department determines that the certificate of insurance or surety bond of a private carrier of passengers has lapsed or been terminated, the department shall suspend the private carrier of passengers’ registration. Registration of a private carrier or organization providing transportation services incidental to operation of a youth camp shall stand suspended immediately upon the effective date of the cancellation.

(c) The department shall notify the private carrier of passengers of an action taken under subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 212.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34688.

A private carrier of passengers shall display the carrier identification number, as required by Section 34507.5, on the vehicles operated pursuant to the registration granted under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34689.

The department shall periodically, but not less frequently than quarterly, transmit to the Department of the California Highway Patrol a list of persons, firms, and corporations that have received a carrier identification number from the Department of the California Highway Patrol, but that have not registered with the department. The Department of the California Highway Patrol may use this list in its normal enforcement activities, including terminal inspections and roadside enforcement, as prima facie evidence of a failure to register.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34690.

(a) Any person or corporation that violates any provision of this division is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or both.

(b) A violation of this section is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code when the conditions specified in either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 17 of the Penal Code are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34691.

(a) Upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that the registration of a private carrier of passengers be suspended for failure to either (1) maintain any vehicle of the carrier in a safe operating condition or to comply with this code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor carrier safety, if that failure is either a consistent failure or presents an imminent danger to public safety, or (2) enroll all drivers in the pull-notice system as required by Section 1808.1, the department shall, pending a hearing in the matter pursuant to subdivision (d), suspend the carrier’s registration. The Department of the California
 Highway Patrol’s written recommendation shall specifically indicate compliance with subdivision (c).

(b) A private carrier of passengers whose registration is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) may obtain a reinspection of its terminal and vehicles by the Department of the California Highway Patrol by submitting a written request for reinstatement to the department and paying a reinstatement fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125). The fees required to be paid by carriers of passengers pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. Upon payment of the fee, the department shall forward a request for reinspection to the Department of the California Highway Patrol, which shall perform a reinspection within a reasonable time. The department shall reinstate a carrier’s
 registration suspended under subdivision (a) promptly upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that the carrier’s safety compliance has improved to the satisfaction of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, unless the registration is suspended for another reason or has been revoked.

(c) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a) to the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall notify the private carrier of passengers in writing of all of the following:

(1) That the Department of the California Highway Patrol has determined that the carrier’s safety record is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the
 determination.

(2) That the determination may result in a suspension or revocation of the carrier’s registration by the department.

(3) That the carrier may request a review of the determination by the Department of the California Highway Patrol within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. If a review pursuant to this paragraph is requested by the carrier, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting any notification to the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Whenever the department suspends the registration of any private carrier of passengers pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall furnish the carrier
 written notice of the suspension and shall hold a hearing within a reasonable time, not to exceed 21 days, after a written request therefor is filed with the department, with a copy thereof furnished to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. At the hearing, the carrier shall show cause why the suspension should not be continued. At the conclusion of the hearing, the department may terminate the suspension, continue the suspension in effect, or revoke the registration. The department may revoke the registration of any carrier suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) at any time 90 days or more after its suspension if the department has not received a written recommendation for reinstatement from the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the carrier has not filed a written request for a hearing with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 34693.)
-------------------------------------------

34692.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a private carrier of passengers, as defined in Section 34681, that is required to register under Section 34683 shall provide and thereafter continue in effect on each vehicle, so long as the carrier may be engaged in conducting those operations, adequate protection against liability imposed by law upon a carrier in accordance with the following:

(1) For the payment of damages for bodily injury to, or death of, one person in any one accident in the amount of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(2) Subject to the limit for one person, in the amount of at least thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, two or more persons in
 any one accident.

(3) For injury to, or destruction of, property of others in the amount of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any one accident.

(b) Transportation services incidental to operation of a youth camp that are provided by either a nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501 (c)(3)), that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of that code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(a)), or an organization that operates an organized camp, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, serving youth 18 years of age or younger shall provide and thereafter continue in effect, so long as it may be engaged in conducting those operations, the following minimum amounts of general liability insurance coverage for vehicles that are used to transport youth:

(1) A minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of general liability insurance coverage for passenger vehicles designed to carry up to eight passengers. For organized camps, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, there shall be an additional two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of general umbrella policy that covers vehicles.

(2) A minimum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) of general liability insurance coverage for vehicles designed to carry up to 15 passengers. For organized camps, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, there shall be an additional five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of general umbrella policy that covers vehicles.

(3) A minimum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) of general liability insurance coverage for vehicles designed to carry more than 15 passengers, and
 an additional three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) of general umbrella liability insurance policy that covers vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 213.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34693.

This division shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 40.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: Operative date applies to Division 14.86, commencing with Section 34680.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.9. MOTOR VEHICLE DAMAGE CONTROL [34700. - 34725.]



CHAPTER 1. Short Title [34700. - 34700.]

34700.

This division may be cited as the Greene-Harmer Motor Vehicle Damage Control Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 598.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Provisions and Definitions [34710. - 34715.]

34710.

As used in this division, “passenger vehicle” means any motor vehicle defined in Section 465, except any of the following motor vehicles:

(a) Motorcycles.

(b) Housecars.

(c) Specially constructed vehicles.

(d) Motor vehicles equipped with four-wheel drive.

(e) Motor vehicles constructed on a truck chassis.

(f) Motor vehicles operated for hire, compensation, or profit.

(g) Makes of motor vehicles of a model year manufactured or sold in California in quantities of less than 2,000 units for each such model year.

(h) Motor vehicles designed and constructed by the manufacturer of such vehicles, for off-highway use, as determined by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 635.)
-------------------------------------------

34715.

No new passenger vehicle, except a passenger vehicle certified by its manufacturer as having been manufactured prior to September 1, 1973, shall be sold or registered on and after September 1, 1973, unless it has a manufacturer’s warranty that it is equipped with an appropriate energy-absorption system that meets the requirement for energy absorption systems set by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Departmental Action [34725. - 34725.]

34725.

Any violation of any provisions of this division may be enjoined in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California, upon request of the Department of Motor Vehicles, except that it shall not be necessary to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 598.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. SIZE, WEIGHT, AND LOAD [35000. - 35796.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [35000. - 35003.]

35000.

The provisions of this division refer exclusively to the size and weight of, and loads upon, vehicles when operated upon the highways.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35001.

The provisions of this division, except those requiring a permit for overweight loads, do not apply to motor trucks equipped with snow removal devices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35002.

(a) (1) This division does not apply to an authorized emergency vehicle owned or operated by a governmental agency while being used in responding to and returning from emergency fire calls, while being moved from place to place in anticipation of emergency fire calls, when used during training in any fire service application or during fire prevention activities, or when vehicles
 ordinarily used for those purposes are necessarily transported for vehicle maintenance, repair, or service. This subdivision only applies to vehicles purchased prior to January 1, 1994. Vehicles purchased on January 1, 1992, to and including December 31, 1993, shall meet the applicable requirements of Standards 1901 to 1904, inclusive, of the National Fire Protection Association, as those standards were in effect on December 31, 1991.

(2) All vehicles described in paragraph (1) first purchased on or after January 1, 1994, shall comply with the applicable permit requirements adopted by the Department of Transportation.

(3) For purposes of this section, “purchased” means the date that the operating agency enters into a contract to purchase the vehicle.

(b) All vehicles described in subdivision (a) purchased on or after
 January 1, 1994, shall meet the following requirements:

(1) It shall be the responsibility of the manufacturer to provide a gross axle weight rating (GAWR), gross combined weight rating (GCWR), and gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR), adequate to carry a full water tank with the allowance for personnel and miscellaneous equipment, including hose load, shown in the table below:PersonnelMisc. EquipmentPumpers1,200 lbs.2,000 lbs.Light attack apparatus 600 lbs. 900 lbs.Water towers1,200 lbs.1,500 lbs.Aerial platforms with ground 
ladders1,200 lbs.2,500 lbs.Aerial ladders with ground 
ladders1,200 lbs.2,500 lbs.
Fire apparatus shall be weighed and certified by the manufacturer to determine compliance with the table above prior to acceptance by the purchaser. Apparatus and chassis manufacturers shall furnish certification of the gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR), gross combined weight rating (GCWR), and gross axle weight rating (GAWR) on a nameplate affixed to the apparatus.

(2) A fire apparatus exceeding 31,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) shall be equipped with a retarder.

(3) For purposes of this section, a “fire apparatus” is a vehicle designed, maintained, and used under emergency conditions to transport personnel and equipment, or for the suppression of fires or mitigation of other hazardous situations, consistent with the 2009 edition
 of Standard 1901 of the National Fire Protection Association.

(4) Notwithstanding the weight exemption provided for in Chapter 7 of Division 2 of Title 21 of the California Code of Regulations, effective on July 2, 2010, nor any other provision of law, a fire apparatus vehicle is prohibited from towing or hauling any other vehicle or equipment while operating under an overweight permit.

(5) This chapter and Chapter 7 of Division 2 of Title 21 of the California Code of Regulations do not limit the discretion of the department or a local government to deny an application for an overweight permit on the basis of good cause.

(c) A vehicle owned, operated, or rented by a public agency that is being used in responding to or returning from an emergency, may be operated as required, if a reasonable effort is first made by
 the agency to obtain verbal permission from an authorized officer or employee of the agency having jurisdiction of the highways used, and, upon termination of the emergency, when the vehicle is returning from the site of the emergency, the public agency either obtains a permit at the location of the emergency or makes a reasonable effort to obtain verbal permission from an authorized officer or employee of the agency having jurisdiction of the highways used, and obtains a written permit for that use pursuant to Section 35780 not later than three days after the date of the emergency. As used in this subdivision, “emergency” means a condition that poses an imminent threat of loss of property or a hazard to life, as determined by the public agency charged with responsibility to respond thereto.

(d) A governmental agency operating an authorized emergency vehicle or other vehicle subject to this section is liable to the governmental agency having
 jurisdiction of a state or county highway for the damage to the highway or a highway structure caused by the operation of the vehicle of a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding that specified in this division. The cost of repair of the damage is a proper charge against the support fund of the governmental agency operating the oversize or overweight vehicle.

(e) Neither the state nor an agency thereof is liable for damage to a highway or highway structure caused by vehicles operated, pursuant to this section, by or on behalf of a local authority or any other local governmental entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   (SB 1220)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

35003.

For the purpose of this division, booms, masts, machinery or other equipment which is not attendant to the efficient operation of the body of the vehicle but which may be attached to the body or chassis or connected with the driving mechanism, shall be regarded as a load.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Width [35100. - 35111.]

35100.

(a) The total outside width of any vehicle or its load shall not exceed 102 inches, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, safety devices which the Secretary of Transportation determines to be necessary for the safe and efficient operation of motor vehicles shall not be included in the calculation of width as specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Any city or county may, by ordinance, prohibit a combination of vehicles of a total
 width in excess of 96 inches upon highways under its jurisdiction. The ordinance shall not be effective until appropriate signs are erected indicating the streets affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1452, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

35100.1.

For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 35100, the following apply:

(a) The metric equivalent of 102 inches, 2.6 meters, meets the requirement of Section 35100.

(b) The width measurement of any vehicle with side walls shall be made from the outside wall of the two opposite sides of the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1452, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

35100.5.

The total outside width of a cotton module mover operated on the highways pursuant to Section 35555 and the load thereon shall not exceed 130 inches in width. However, a county board of supervisors, with respect to any or all county highways within its jurisdiction or any portion thereof, may by resolution prohibit or limit the operation of cotton module movers exceeding the maximum width specified in Section 35100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 270, Sec. 3.   Effective July 3, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

35101.

When any vehicle is equipped with pneumatic tires, the maximum width from the outside of one wheel and tire to the outside of the opposite outer wheel and tire shall not exceed 108 inches, but the outside width of the body of the vehicle or the load thereon shall not exceed 102 inches.

Vehicles manufactured, reconstructed, or modified after the effective date of amendments to this section enacted during the 1983 portion of the 1983–84 Regular Session of the Legislature, to utilize the 102 inch maximum width dimension, shall be equipped with axles, tires, and wheels of sufficient width
 to adequately and safely stabilize the vehicle. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall conduct tests relating to the dynamic stability of vehicles utilizing body widths over 96 inches, up to and including 102 inches, to determine the necessity for establishing performance standards under the authority of Section 34500. Such standards if established shall be consistent with width standards established by or under the authority of the United States Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 145, Sec. 2.   Effective June 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35102.

When any vehicle carries a load of loosely piled agricultural products such as hay, straw, or leguminous plants in bulk but not crated, baled, boxed, or sacked, such load of loosely piled material and any loading racks retaining the same shall not exceed 120 inches in width.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35103.

(a) A vehicle used for recreational purposes may exceed the maximum width established under Section 35100 if the excess width is attributable to an appurtenance, excluding a safety device, that does not exceed six inches beyond either sidewall of the vehicle.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), an appurtenance is an integral part of a vehicle and includes, but is not limited to, awnings, grab handles, lighting equipment, cameras, and vents. An appurtenance may not be used as
 a load carrying device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 222, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

35104.

The limitations as to width do not apply to the following vehicles except that these vehicles shall not exceed a width of 120 inches:

(a) Special mobile equipment.

(b) Special construction or highway maintenance equipment.

(c) Motor vehicles designed for, and used exclusively to, haul feed for livestock that are exempted from registration by subdivision (c) of Section 36102, except when operated on a highway during darkness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35105.

Any city organized under a freeholders’ charter may by ordinance permit a total outside width of vehicle and load in excess of the limits set forth in Sections 35100, 35101, 35102, 35104, and 35106 when the vehicle is used exclusively within the boundary limits of the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 145, Sec. 4.   Effective June 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35106.

(a) Motor coaches or buses may have a maximum width not exceeding 102 inches.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), motor coaches or buses operated under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission in urban or suburban service may have a maximum outside width not exceeding 104 inches, when approved by order of the Public Utilities Commission for use on routes designated by it. Motor coaches or buses operated by common carriers of passengers for hire in urban or
 suburban service and not under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission may have a maximum outside width not exceeding 104 inches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 665.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

35107.

“Urban and suburban service” means a service performed in urban or suburban areas, or between municipalities in close proximity, except that:

(a) The one-way route mileage of the service shall not be more than 50 miles. 

(b) Designated motor coach routes over state highways outside limits of incorporated cities where the one-way route mileage is over 25 miles, but does not exceed 50 miles, shall be approved by the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35109.

Lights, mirrors, or devices which are required to be mounted upon a vehicle under this code may extend beyond the permissible width of the vehicle to a distance not exceeding 10 inches on each side of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 145, Sec. 7.   Effective June 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35110.

(a) Door handles, hinges, cable cinchers, chain binders, aerodynamic devices, holders for the display of placards warning of hazardous materials, and a tarping system and all nonproperty carrying devices or components thereof, may extend three inches on each side of the vehicle.

(b) For purposes of this section, “aerodynamic device” means a device that uses technologies that minimize drag and improve airflow over an entire tractor-trailer vehicle. These include gap fairings that reduce turbulence between the tractor and trailer, side skirts that minimize wind under the trailer, and
 rear fairings that reduce turbulence and pressure drop at the rear of the trailer, provided that these devices shall not adversely impact the vehicle’s swept width and turning characteristics and that the primary purpose of the device is not for advertising.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “a tarping system” means a movable device used to enclose the cargo area of flatbed semitrailers or
 trailers.

(2) Subdivision (a) applies to all component parts of a tarping system, including the following:

(A) The transverse structure at the front of the vehicle to which the sliding walls and roof of the tarp mechanism are attached, provided the structure is not also intended or designed to comply with Section 393.106 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The transverse structure may be up to 108 inches wide if properly centered so that neither side extends more than three inches beyond the structural edge of the vehicle.

(B) The side rails running the length of the vehicle.

(C) The rear doors, provided the only function of the rear doors is to seal the cargo area and anchor the sliding walls and roof.

(D) The “wings” designed to close the gap between a headerboard designed to comply with Section 393.106 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the movable walls and roof of a tarping system, provided they are add-on pieces designed to bear only the load of the tarping system itself and are not integral parts of the load-bearing headerboard structure.

(d) For purposes of this section, a “headerboard designed to comply with Section 393.106 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations” is load bearing and does not exceed 102 inches in width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35111.

No passenger vehicle shall be operated on any highway with any load carried thereon extending beyond the line of the fenders on its left side or more than six inches beyond the line of the fenders on its right side.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 120.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Height [35250. - 35252.]

35250.

No vehicle or load shall exceed a height of 14 feet measured from the surface upon which the vehicle stands, except that a double-deck bus may not exceed a height of 14 feet, 3 inches. Any vehicle or load which exceeds a height of 13 feet, 6 inches, shall only be operated on those highways where deemed to be safe by the owner of the vehicle or the entity operating the bus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1287, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1984.   Operative January 1, 1985, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1287.)
-------------------------------------------

35251.

(a) A boom or mast which is designed to be raised and lowered by hydraulic mechanisms and which is a constituent part of or an attachment to a vehicle or machine, shall be securely chained or otherwise restrained to ensure compliance with Section 35250 while the vehicle or machine is being transported as a load or driven upon any highway.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply when the configuration and design of the hydraulic boom effectively restrain the movement of the boom
 during transit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.

(a) A pilot car may operate a vertical clearance measuring device with a height in excess of 14 feet when escorting a permitted overheight load. The pilot car may also operate the vertical clearance measuring device when surveying a route for a permitted overheight load.

(b) Any vertical measuring device used by a pilot car shall be designed and operated so as to avoid any damages to overhead structures. The measuring device shall be securely affixed to the pilot car, and shall be operated in a manner that does not create a hazard to surrounding traffic.

(c) The operator of the pilot car shall not reduce the vehicle’s speed more than 20 miles per hour below the posted speed limit on the roadway to measure overhead clearance, nor exit the vehicle to measure the clearance of overhead structures from a vantage point on or above the roadway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Length [35400. - 35414.]

35400.

(a) A vehicle may not exceed a length of 40 feet.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A vehicle used in a combination of vehicles when the excess length is caused by auxiliary parts, equipment, or machinery not used as space to carry any part of the load, except that the combination of vehicles shall not exceed the length provided for combination vehicles.

(2) A vehicle, when the excess length is caused by any parts necessary to comply with the fender and mudguard regulations of this code.

(3) (A) An articulated bus or articulated trolley coach that does not exceed a length of 60 feet.

(B) An articulated bus or articulated trolley coach described in subparagraph (A) may be equipped with a folding device attached to the front of the bus or trolley if the device is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles. The device, including any bicycles transported thereon, shall be mounted in a manner that does not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety equipment, and shall not extend more than 36 inches from the front body of the bus or trolley coach when fully deployed. The handlebars of a bicycle
 that is transported on a device described in this subparagraph shall not extend more than 42 inches from the front of the bus.

(C) (i) An articulated bus or articulated trolley coach described in subparagraph (A) may be equipped with a folding device attached to the front of the bus or trolley if the device is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles. The device, including any bicycles transported thereon, shall be mounted in a manner that does not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety equipment, and shall not extend more than 40 inches from the front body of the bus or trolley coach when fully deployed. The handlebars of a